Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.610

Library capital facility areas authorized.

A county legislative authority may establish a library capital facility area pursuant to chapter 27.15 RCW.

[ 1995 c 368 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—1995 c 368: See RCW 27.15.005.